Idaho, session 2025, H0026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-708, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-708. ABLE ACCOUNTS. (1) Findings and intent. The federal achieving
a better life experience (ABLE) act, public law 113-295, 26 U.S.C. 529A,
provides that a state may establish a program under which certain individ-
uals with disabilities may open accounts in order to save money to pay for
qualified disability expenses, such as expenses relating to education,
housing, transportation, employment training and assistive technology.
These accounts may be opened by qualified Idahoans in any state having an
ABLE account program, and are to be disregarded when determining an indi-
vidual's eligibility for assistance programs established by federal law,
including medicaid and supplemental security income. Though Idaho has not
implemented its own ABLE account program, the The legislature finds that
ABLE accounts promote dignified personal independence and opportunities
for individuals with disabilities. It is therefore the intent of the leg-
islature to ensure that the state provide technical assistance to Idahoans
interested in opening ABLE accounts in other states, and to protect the eli-
gibility of individuals who have such ABLE accounts when applying for state
or local assistance.:
(a) Create an Idaho ABLE account program by allowing the Idaho state
treasurer to enter into an agreement with a national consortium of ABLE
accounts;
(b) Protect the eligibility of individuals who have an ABLE account
when applying for state or local assistance; and
(c) Provide technical assistance to Idahoans interested in opening an
Idaho ABLE account.
(2) Eligibility. Notwithstanding any provision of state law or local
ordinance to the contrary, if an applicant for a state or local assistance
program or a need-based state or local grant has an ABLE account in another
state, the account, and any activity related thereto, shall be disregarded
when determining the applicant's eligibility for the assistance program or
grant to the extent that the account and any activity related thereto would
be disregarded in determining the applicant's eligibility for an assistance
program established by federal law.


(3) Technical assistance and financial literacy outreach. Subject to
appropriation, there is hereby established in the Idaho state independent
living council a function to provide individuals with disabilities, and
those assisting them, with technical assistance relating related to the
Idaho ABLE act. Such function shall be within the Idaho state independent
living council until such time as it might be assigned to another appropriate
agency. Such technical assistance shall include information and assistance
with respect to setting up ABLE accounts in other states, whether through or
in conjunction with databases and websites operated by or under the auspices
of organizations or government agencies, or otherwise, and the provision of
information related to financial literacy. account program for eligible
participants. The Idaho state treasurer shall include the ABLE account pro-
gram in financial literacy outreach efforts, and the Idaho state independent
living council shall also provide financial literacy outreach for the Idaho
ABLE account program.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 7, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-709, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-709. ESTABLISHMENT OF AN ABLE ACCOUNT ADVISORY COUNCIL -- APPOINT-
MENT OF MEMBERS -- MEETINGS -- COMPENSATION -- DUTIES. (1) There is hereby
established in the office of the state treasurer an ABLE account advisory
council. The ABLE account advisory council shall consist of the state trea-
surer, who shall act as chair, the executive director of the Idaho state
independent living council, who shall serve in an ex officio capacity, and
members appointed by the governor after considering recommendations of the
state treasurer.
(2)(a) The members of the ABLE account advisory council subject to ap-
pointment shall be:
(i) Two (2) members who are knowledgeable and have experience or
a background in but are not currently employed by the department of
health and welfare or the division of vocational rehabilitation;
(ii) One (1) member who is knowledgeable and has experience or a
background in education;
(iii) One (1) member who is knowledgeable and has experience or a
background with disabled veterans;
(iv) One (1) ABLE account owner; and
(v) One (1) parent or guardian of an ABLE account owner.
(b) Appointed members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor for
four (4) year terms. Initial appointments shall be staggered as fol-
lows:
(i) One (1) member shall serve for one (1) year;
(ii) One (1) member shall serve for two (2) years;
(iii) Two (2) members shall serve for three (3) years; and
(iv) Two (2) members shall serve for four (4) years.
(c) If there is a vacancy for any reason in the seat of an appointed mem-
ber, the governor shall make an appointment to become effective immedi-
ately for the duration of the unexpired term.
(3) The meetings of the ABLE account advisory council shall be held
quarterly and at other times upon the call of the chair or a majority vote


of the council. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) The council members appointed pursuant to this section shall be
compensated as provided by section 59-509(a), Idaho Code.
(5) The ABLE account advisory council shall advise the state treasurer
and the executive director of the Idaho state independent living council re-
garding policies and actions that enhance the outreach, marketing, and edu-
cation of the Idaho ABLE account program. The chair of the council shall pro-
vide an annual report to the legislature.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.